apertium-kat.kat.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Georgian

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <num>    # Numeral

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <pl>     # Plural
# <sg>     # Singular

# Other symbols
# >        # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS

NounInfl
AdjInfl
VerbInfl
Number
Punctuation


PATTERN NounInfl

Nouns [<n>:] N-Num? (N-Case N-Postpos?)[^[nom,dat,gen,nopost]]

ProperNouns(1) [<np>:] ProperNouns(2) N-Num? (N-Case N-Postpos?)[^[nom,dat,gen,nopost]]

PATTERN AdjInfl

Adjectives [<adj>:] Adj-Case
Adjectives [<adj><subst>:] N-Case

PATTERN VerbInfl

#Verbs(1) V-Prefix-Person Verbs(2) Verbs(3) Verbs(4) V-Suffix-Impf V-Suffix-Person V-Suffix-Aux V-Suffix-Pl
#Verbs(1) V-Person(1) Verbs(2) Verbs(3) Verbs(4) V-Suffix-Impf V-Person(2) V-Suffix-Aux V-Suffix-Pl
#(V-Person(1)[subj] Verbs(2) Verbs(3) Verbs(4) V-Suffix-Pres V-Person(2)[subj])[^[impf,ind,sub]]
#(V-Person(1) Verbs(2) Verbs(3) Verbs(4) V-Suffix-Pres V-Person(2))[^[impf,ind,sub],^[subj,obj]]
# Present series
(V-Person(1)[subj] Verbs(2) Verbs(3) Verbs(4) V-Suffix-Pres V-Person(2)[subj])[^[impf,ind,sub,aor]]
# Future series
(Verbs(1) [:>] V-Person(1)[subj] Verbs(2) Verbs(3) Verbs(4) V-Suffix-Fut V-Person(2)[subj])[^[impf,ind,sub,aor]]
# Aorist Series
(Verbs(1) [:>] V-Person(1)[subj] Verbs(2) Verbs(3) V-Suffix-Aor V-Person(2)[subj])[^[impf,ind,sub,aor]]
# Perfective series
(Verbs(1) [:>] V-Person(1)[obj] [:{ი}] Verbs(3) Verbs(4) V-Suffix-Perf1 V-Person(2)[obj])[^[ind,sub]]
(Verbs(1) [:>] V-Person(1)[obj] [:ე] Verbs(3) Verbs(4) V-Suffix-Perf2 V-Person(2)[obj])[^[ind,sub]]

LEXICON V-Person(2)[subj]
[ind]:ვ>	[ind]<p1><sg>:
[impf]:ვ>	[impf]<p1><sg>:>ი
[sub]:ვ>	[sub]<p1><sg>:ე
[aor]:ვ>	[aor]<p1><sg>:ე

[ind]:	[ind]<p2><sg>:
[impf]:	[impf]<p2><sg>:>ი
[sub]:	[sub]<p2><sg>:ე
[aor]:	[aor]<p2><sg>:ე

[ind]:	[ind]<p3><sg>:>ს
[impf]:	[impf]<p3><sg>:>ა               # impf,aor
[aor]:	[aor]<p3><sg>:>ა               # impf,aor
[sub]:	[sub]<p3><sg>:>ეს

[ind]:ვ>	[ind]<p1><pl>:>თ
[impf]:ვ>	[impf]<p1><pl>:>ით
[sub]:ვ>	[sub]<p1><pl>:>ეთ
[aor]:ვ>	[aor]<p1><pl>:>ეთ

[ind]:	[ind]<p2><pl>:>თ
[impf]:	[impf]<p2><pl>:>ით
[sub]:	[sub]<p2><pl>:>ეთ
[aor]:	[aor]<p2><pl>:>ეთ

[ind]:	[ind]<p3><pl>:>{e}ნ             # ind only
[impf]:	[impf]<p3><pl>:>ნენ       # impf,sub only
[sub]:	[sub]<p3><pl>:>ნენ       # impf,sub only
[aor]:	[aor]<p3><pl>:>ეს             # aor only

LEXICON V-Person(2)[obj]  # everything is ind & sub except last 4
[ind]:მ>	[ind]<p1><sg>:
[sub]:მ>	[sub]<p1><sg>:>ს      # sub only
[ind]:გ>	[ind]<p2><sg>:
[sub]:გ>	[sub]<p2><sg>:>ს      # sub only
[ind]:{w}>	[ind]<p3><sg>:
[sub]:	[sub]<p3><sg>:>ს      # sub only
[ind]:გვ>	[ind]<p1><pl>:
[sub]:გვ>	[sub]<p1><pl>:>ს      # sub only
[ind]:გ>	[ind]<p2><pl>:>თ
[sub]:გ>	[sub]<p2><pl>:>თ
[ind]:{w}>	[ind]<p3><pl>:>თ
[sub]:	[sub]<p3><pl>:>თ

LEXICON V-Suffix-Pres
<pres><ind>[ind]:
<impf>[impf]:>დ
<pres><sub>[sub]:>დ

LEXICON V-Suffix-Fut
<fut><ind>[ind]:
<cond>[impf]:>დ
<fut><sub>[sub]:>დ

LEXICON V-Suffix-Aor
<aor><ind>[aor]:
<opt>[ind]:>ო

LEXICON V-Suffix-Perf1
<perf><ind>[ind]:>ი>ა

LEXICON V-Suffix-Perf2
<plu>[ind]:>ინ>ა
<perf><sub>[sub]:>ინ>ო


LEXICON Adj-Case

<nom>:>{ი}
<erg>:>{მ}{A}
<dat>:
<gen>:>{ი}
<ins>:>{ი}
<advl>:
<voc>:>{ო}


LEXICON N-Case

<nom>[nom]:>{ი}
<erg>[nopost]:>მ{A}
<dat>[dat]:>ს
<gen>[gen]:>{i}ს
<ins>[nopost]:>{i}თ{I}
<advl>[nopost]:>{ა}დ
<voc>[nopost]:>{ო}  # Dir/LR
<voc>[nopost]:>{O}

# Special case-postposition combinations #
## doing it this way instead of morphophonology because it's simpler
<dat>+ში<post>[nopost]:>ში # "in, to"
<ins>+დან<post>[nopost]:>{ი}>დან # "from, since"
<advl>+მდე<post>[nopost]:>{ა}>მდე # "up to"

LEXICON N-Postpos

[nopost]:
+ზე<post>[dat]:>ზე # "on"
+თან<post>[dat]:>თან # "near"
+ვით<post>[dat]:ა>ვით # "like a"
+ვით<post>[nom]:>ვით # "like a"
+თვის<post>[gen]:>თვის # "for"
+ებრ<post>[gen]:>ებრ # "like a"
+კენ<post>[gen]:>კენ # "towards"
+გან<post>[gen]:>გან # "from/of"
+ურთ<post>[gen]:>ურთ # "together with"

LEXICON N-Num

<pl>:>ებ


###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

LEXICON Verbs(4)
# Preverb	Version	Root	ThematicSuffix
:ა	:ა	აშენება<v><tv>:შენ	:ებ	# "build"

LEXICON Adjectives

დიდ:დიდ # "big"
ჭაღარა:ჭაღარა # "grey-haried"
ახალ:ახალ # "new"
ქართულ:ქართულ # "Georgian"
საინტერესო:საინტერესო # "interesting"
კარგ:კარგ # "good"

LEXICON Nouns

სახლი:სახლ # "home, house, dwelling, house, home, dwelling, room, castle, fortress"
მამა:მამ{ა} # "father"
კაცი:კაც # "man, human, courier"
წელი¹:წ{ე}ლ # "year"
წელი²:წელ # "waist, intesting"

#### SCRAPED FROM WIKIPEDIA: processed ####
თვალი:თვალ # "eye"
თვალი:თოლ # "eye (Mtiuleti, Ingilo, Khevi, Fereydan and Tusheti)" # Dir/LR
აბაკი:აბაკ # "abacus"
ნაკვერცხალი:ნაკვერცხალ # "ember"
ნაკვერცხალი:ნაკვერჩხალ # "ember" # Dir/LR
ნისკარტი:ნისკარტ # "beak"
ნისკარტი:ნიკარტ # "beak (Imereti, Chveneburi forms)" # Dir/LR
სურა:სურ{ა} # "jug, sura"
ტეგანი:ტეგან # "common rue"
ფეტვი:ფეტვ # "millet"
ფო̈ტ:ფო̈ტ # "millet (Ingilo)"
ჩონგური:ჩონგურ # "chonguri"
ჭუნირი:ჭუნირი # "čuniri (instrument)"
წალიკა:წალიკ # "water pepper, buttercup"
ხაჭოჲ:ხაჭოჲ # "curd, quark (Tusheti)"
სვანი:სვან # "person from Svan, Svaneti"
სინორი:სინორ # "border; sinori (food)"
